Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5976HV (1) 91 je/ko H.F. 2744 Section 1. Section 17A.6, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. âPublicationâ does not include the Iowa Code, Iowa Acts, 3 Iowa administrative code, or Iowa court rules , or uniform rules 4 on agency procedure . 5 Sec. 2. RESCISSION OF ADMINISTRATIVE RULES ââ ONGOING 6 APPLICABILITY. 7 1. The following Iowa administrative rules relating to 8 subjects addressed by uniform rules on agency procedure adopted 9 by the administrative rules coordinator pursuant to section 10 17A.24 are rescinded as of July 1, 2026: 11 a. 11 IAC chs. 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9. 12 b. 11 IAC 117.20. 13 c. 21 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 8. 14 d. 27 IAC chs. 3, 4, 5, and 8. 15 e. 61 IAC chs. 2, 11, and 12. 16 f. 61 IAC 10.2. 17 g. 81 IAC chs. 24 and 27. 18 h. 81 IAC 25.10. 19 i. 101 IAC ch. 5. 20 j. 101 IAC 2.1, 2.3, and 2.4. 21 k. 111 IAC chs. 3, 4, 5, 12, and 13. 22 l. 129 IAC chs. 6 and 11. 23 m. 161 IAC chs. 4 and 11. 24 n. 161 IAC 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, and 15.3. 25 o. 181 IAC 1.8, 1.9, 1.10, 1.11, and 1.12. 26 p. 187 IAC chs. 5, 6, 7, 11, and 12. 27 q. 189 IAC chs. 4, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 25. 28 r. 191 IAC chs. 2, 3, and 4. 29 s. 193 IAC chs. 3 and 7. 30 t. 193E IAC 1.4. 31 u. 193F IAC 1.6 and 1.7. 32 v. 199 IAC chs. 3, 4, and 5. 33 w. 199 IAC 1.3 and 1.7. 34 x. 201 IAC chs. 5, 7, 10, 11, and 12. 35 -1- LSB 5976HV (1) 91 je/ko 1/ 6 H.F. 2744 y. 205 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, and 15. 1 z. 205 IAC 6.3. 2 aa. 261 IAC chs. 195, 196, 197, 198, and 199. 3 ab. 263 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6. 4 ac. 265 IAC chs. 7, 13, 16, 17, and 18. 5 ad. 265 IAC 15.9. 6 ae. 281 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6. 7 af. 282 IAC chs. 2, 3, 5, and 6. 8 ag. 282 IAC 11.1 and 11.7 through 11.32. 9 ah. 283 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 6, and 7. 10 ai. 284 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, and 5. 11 aj. 288 IAC chs. 3, 11, 12, and 13. 12 ak. 289 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, and 8. 13 al. 301 IAC ch. 5. 14 am. 301 IAC 2.4 and 2.5. 15 an. 351 IAC chs. 2, 11, 12, 13, 14, and 15. 16 ao. 371 IAC ch. 9. 17 ap. 371 IAC 1.2(6). 18 aq. 441 IAC chs. 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 9. 19 ar. 481 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 9, 366, 367, 381, 382, and 20 435. 21 as. 481 IAC 570.7(1), 615.6(1), 650.7(1), and 885.1(1). 22 at. 486 IAC ch. 8. 23 au. 491 IAC chs. 2 and 3. 24 av. 491 IAC 1.4, 1.8, and 4.20 through 4.48. 25 aw. 493 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6. 26 ax. 495 IAC chs. 17, 19, 26, 30, 31, and 33. 27 ay. 497 IAC chs. 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 9. 28 az. 501 IAC chs. 7 and 16. 29 ba. 501 IAC 1.11. 30 bb. 541 IAC chs. 5, 6, 7, and 8. 31 bc. 541 IAC 1.3. 32 bd. 543 IAC ch. 5. 33 be. 545 IAC chs. 5, 6, 7, and 8. 34 bf. 547 IAC chs. 6, 7, 8, and 9. 35 -2- LSB 5976HV (1) 91 je/ko 2/ 6 H.F. 2744 bg. 547 IAC 2.5 and 2.6. 1 bh. 561 IAC chs. 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 10. 2 bi. 567 IAC chs. 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 13. 3 bj. 571 IAC chs. 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 11. 4 bk. 575 IAC ch. 3. 5 bl. 575 IAC 1.5 and 1.8. 6 bm. 591 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 16, and 17. 7 bn. 601 IAC ch. 2. 8 bo. 605 IAC ch. 2. 9 bp. 621 IAC chs. 2, 9, 10, and 12. 10 bq. 621 IAC 1.5 and 1.9. 11 br. 661 IAC chs. 10 and 80. 12 bs. 661 IAC 401.101 through 401.314 and 600.5. 13 bt. 681 IAC chs. 17, 18, 19, and 20. 14 bu. 685 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, and 15. 15 bv. 701 IAC chs. 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7. 16 bw. 701 IAC 115.1(3) and 115.11. 17 bx. 721 IAC chs. 3, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 10. 18 by. 741 IAC ch. 5. 19 bz. 741 IAC 2.4 and 2.5. 20 ca. 751 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 16, and 18. 21 cb. 751 IAC 5.17, 5.18, and 5.19. 22 cc. 761 IAC chs. 4, 10, 11, 12, and 13. 23 cd. 781 IAC chs. 2, 17, 18, and 19. 24 ce. 801 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 6, and 8. 25 cf. 811 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, 5, 14, and 16. 26 cg. 817 IAC chs. 2, 3, 5, and 6. 27 ch. 821 IAC 1.5, 1.6, and 1.8. 28 ci. 871 IAC chs. 2, 3, 4, and 5. 29 cj. 876 IAC chs. 4, 5, 7, 9, and 12. 30 ck. 877 IAC 1.1. 31 2. As soon as practicable after July 1, 2026, the 32 administrative code editor shall remove the language of the 33 Iowa administrative rules referenced in subsection 1 of this 34 section from the Iowa administrative code. 35 -3- LSB 5976HV (1) 91 je/ko 3/ 6 H.F. 2744 3. Administrative rules rescinded pursuant to subsection 1 1 remain applicable to any administrative or judicial proceeding 2 initiated before July 1, 2026, for the pendency of the action. 3 Sec. 3. EMERGENCY RULES. 4 1. An agency may adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, 5 subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, 6 providing for additions, exceptions, or amendments to uniform 7 rules on agency procedure adopted by the administrative rules 8 coordinator pursuant to section 17A.24. The rules shall be 9 effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is 10 specified in the rules, but no later than June 30, 2026. Any 11 rules adopted in accordance with this subsection shall also be 12 published as a notice of intended action as provided in section 13 17A.4. 14 2. An agency may only adopt emergency rules under subsection 15 1 if the agency determines one or more of the following 16 applies. The agency shall explain its determination in the 17 preamble of the rulemaking document filed pursuant to section 18 17A.4, subsection 3. 19 a. The rule is necessary to comply with a legal obligation 20 imposed on the agency. The agency shall include in the 21 explanation a specific citation of the source of the legal 22 obligation and a description of how the rule is necessary to 23 comply with the legal obligation. 24 b. The rule is otherwise determined to be necessary by the 25 agency. The agency shall include in the explanation the reason 26 the agency determined the rule to be necessary. 27 3. Notwithstanding section 17A.4A, a regulatory analysis 28 shall not be required for rules adopted pursuant to subsection 29 1. 30 4. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an agency 31 from engaging in rulemaking pursuant to chapter 17A relating to 32 uniform rules on agency procedure adopted pursuant to section 33 17A.24 that is not subject to this section. 34 5. This section is repealed July 1, 2026. 35 -4- LSB 5976HV (1) 91 je/ko 4/ 6 H.F. 2744 6. The repeal of this section pursuant to subsection 5 shall 1 not be construed to affect the validity of rules adopted under 2 this section before the date of repeal. 3 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 4 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 5 The section of this Act providing for emergency rulemaking 6 and a repeal. 7